North Carolina statutes. Chapter 136. Transportation.
Article 2A. State Transportation Generally.
§ 136-44.14.
Curb ramps or curb cuts for handicapped persons.

Curbs constructed on each side of any street or road, where curbs and sidewalks are provided and at other major points of pedestrian flow, shall meet the following minimum requirements:

No less than two curb ramps or curb cuts shall be provided per lineal block, located at intersections.

In no case, shall the width of a curb ramp or curb cut be less than 40 inches.

The maximum gradient of such curb ramps or curb cuts shall be eight and thirty-three one-hundredths percent (8.33%) (12 inches slope for every one-inch rise) in relationship to the grade of the street or road.

One curb ramp or curb cut may be provided under special conditions between each radius point of a street turnout of an intersection, if adequate provisions are made to prevent vehicular traffic from encroaching on the ramp.

Minimum requirements for curb ramps or curb cuts under subsection (a) shall be met (i) in the initial construction of such curbs, and (ii) whenever such curbs are reconstructed, including, but not limited to, reconstruction for maintenance procedures and traffic operations, repair, or correction of utilities.

The Department of Transportation, Division of Highways, Highway Design Section, is authorized and directed to develop guidelines to implement this Article in consultation with the Governor’s Study Committee on Architectural Barriers (or the Committee on Barrier-Free Design of the Governor’s Committee on Employment of the Handicapped if the Governor’s Study Committee on Architectural Barriers ceases to exist). All curb ramps or curb cuts constructed or reconstructed in North Carolina shall conform to the guidelines of the Highway Design Section.

The Department of Transportation, Division of Highways, Highway Design Section, is authorized and directed to provide free copies of this Article together with implementary guidelines and standards, to municipal and county governments and public utilities operating within the State.

History.

1973, c. 718, ss. 1-4.

§ 136-44.15.

Expired.

§ 136-44.16.
Authorized use of contract maintenance resurfacing program funds.

Of the contract maintenance resurfacing program funds appropriated by the General Assembly to the Department of Transportation, an amount not to exceed fifteen percent (15%) of the Board of Transportation’s allocation of these funds may be used for widening existing narrow pavements.

The uses of slurry seal treatments, microsurfacing treatments, and thin lift asphalt overlays for pavement preservation treatments are authorized uses of contract maintenance resurfacing program funds.

History.

1997-443, s. 32.12; 2003-112, s. 1; 2014-100, s. 34.11(d).

§ 136-44.17.
Pavement preservation program.

Program Established. — The Department of Transportation shall establish the pavement preservation program.

Eligible Activities or Treatments. — Applications eligible for funding under the pavement preservation program include the following preservation activities or treatments for asphalt pavement structures:

Chip seals, slurry seals, fog seals, sand seals, scrub seals, and cape seals.

Microsurfacing.

Profile milling not covered by resurfacing.

Asphalt rejuvenators.

Open graded asphalt friction course.

Overlays less than 1,000 feet in length.

Diamond grinding.

Joint sealing.

Dowel bar retrofit.

Partial-depth or full-depth repairs and reclamations.

Ultra-thin whitetopping.

Thin lift and sand asphalt overlays.

Asphalt crack sealing.

Pavement markers and markings.

Ineligible Activities or Treatments. — The pavement preservation program shall not include the following preservation activities or treatments:

Contract resurfacing activities or major pavement rehabilitation treatments and pretreatments that are used in combination with a resurfacing treatment, such as profile milling or chip seals.

Routine maintenance activities used to maintain and preserve the condition of roads. Treatments include, but are not limited to, pothole patching, rut filling, cleaning of roadside ditches and structures, shoulder maintenance, and retracing of pavement markings.

Maintenance and preservation activities performed on bridges or culverts.

Activities related to positive guidance or signal maintenance program functions.

Encumbrance Schedule. — Beginning in the 2015-2016 fiscal year, the Department of Transportation shall spend or encumber all funds appropriated by the General Assembly to the Department for the pavement preservation program by June 30 of the fiscal year for which the funds were appropriated.

History.

2014-100, s. 34.11(f); 2015-241, s. 29.17(a); 2017-57, s. 34.9.

§§ 136-44.18,
136-44.19.

Reserved for future codification purposes.